Washington statutes.
RCW 18.138.060

Renewal of certification—Fee.

(1) Every person certified as a certified dietitian or certified nutritionist shall renew the certification according to administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(2) All fees collected under this section shall be credited to the health professions account as required.

[ 1996 c 191 s 85; 1991 c 3 s 283; 1988 c 277 s 7.]